Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-739.02
Transfer of right to use ground
water; recording; recovery of cost; manner.

An instrument of transfer of the right
to use ground water shall be recorded by a natural resources district with
the register of deeds in each county in which is situated the real estate,
or any part thereof, from which a transfer of certified water uses or certified
irrigated acres occurred, in any case in which a transfer of certified water
uses or certified irrigated acres has been approved by such district. The
instrument of transfer of the right to use ground water shall include a description
of the real estate to and from which the certified water uses or certified
irrigated acres were transferred, the nature of the transfer, and the date
on which the transfer occurred. The district may recover the cost of filing
an instrument of transfer of the right to use ground water from the person
seeking the transfer. The instrument of transfer of the right to use ground
water shall be executed, acknowledged, and recorded in the same manner as
conveyances of real estate.

Laws 2009, LB477, § 8.